Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 1 General Provisions
49-2-14.1.
Records check requirement for licensing certain facilities.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Conviction” means a finding or verdict of guilty or a plea of guilty regardless of whether an appeal of the conviction has been sought.

“Crime” means commission of the following offenses:

A violation of Code Section 16-5-1;

A violation of Code Section 16-5-21, relating to aggravated assault;

A violation of Code Section 16-5-24, relating to aggravated battery;

A violation of Code Section 16-5-70, relating to cruelty to children;

A violation of Article 8 of Chapter 5 of Title 16;

A violation of Code Section 16-6-1, relating to rape;

A violation of Code Section 16-6-2, relating to aggravated sodomy;

A violation of Code Section 16-6-4, relating to child molestation;

A violation of Code Section 16-6-5, relating to enticing a child for indecent purposes;

A violation of Code Section 16-6-5.1, relating to improper sexual contact by employee or agent, improper sexual contact by a foster parent, and improper sexual contact by person in a position of trust;

A violation of Code Section 16-6-22.2, relating to aggravated sexual battery;

A violation of Code Section 16-8-41; or

Any other offense committed in another jurisdiction that, if committed in this state, would be deemed to be a crime listed in this paragraph without regard to its designation elsewhere.

“Criminal record” means any of the following:

Conviction of a crime;

Arrest, charge, and sentencing for a crime where:

A plea of nolo contendere was entered to the charge;

First offender treatment without adjudication of guilt pursuant to the charge was granted; or

Adjudication or sentence was otherwise withheld or not entered on the charge; or

Arrest and being charged for a crime if the charge is pending, unless the time for prosecuting such crime has expired pursuant to Chapter 3 of Title 17.

“Facility” means a child welfare agency required to be licensed under Code Section 49-5-12.

“GCIC” means the Georgia Crime Information Center established under Article 2 of Chapter 3 of Title 35.

“GCIC information” means criminal history record information as defined in Code Section 35-3-30.

“License” means the document issued by the department to authorize the facility to operate.

“Owner” means any individual or any person affiliated with a corporation, partnership, or association with 10 percent or greater ownership interest in a facility providing care to persons under the license of the facility in this state and who:

Purports to or exercises authority of the owner in a facility;

Applies to operate or operates a facility;

Maintains an office on the premises of a facility;

Resides at a facility;

Has direct access to persons receiving care at a facility;

Provides direct personal supervision of facility personnel by being immediately available to provide assistance and direction during the time such facility services are being provided; or

Enters into a contract to acquire ownership of a facility.

“Records check application” means fingerprints in such form and of such quality as prescribed by the Georgia Crime Information Center under standards adopted by the Federal Bureau of Investigation and a records search fee to be established by the department by rule and regulation, payable in such form as the department may direct to cover the cost of obtaining criminal background information pursuant to this Code section.

An owner with a criminal record shall not operate or hold a license to operate a facility, and the department shall revoke the license of any owner operating a facility or refuse to issue a license to any owner operating a facility if it determines that such owner has a criminal record; provided, however, that an owner who holds a license to operate a facility on or before June 30, 2007, shall not have his or her license revoked prior to a hearing being held before a hearing officer pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

Prior to approving any license for a new facility and periodically as established by the department by rule and regulation, the department shall require an owner to submit a records check application. The department shall establish a uniform method of obtaining an owner’s records check application.

Unless the department contracts pursuant to subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, the department shall transmit to the GCIC the fingerprints and records search fee from each fingerprint records check application in accordance with Code Section 35-3-35. Upon receipt thereof, the GCIC shall promptly transmit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a search of bureau records and an appropriate report and shall promptly conduct a search of its records and records to which it has access. Within ten days after receiving fingerprints acceptable to the GCIC and the fee, the GCIC shall notify the department in writing of any criminal record or if there is no such finding. After a search of Federal Bureau of Investigation records and fingerprints and upon receipt of the bureau’s report, the department shall make a determination about an owner’s criminal record and shall notify the owner in writing as to the department’s determination as to whether the owner has or does not have a criminal record.

The department may either perform criminal background checks under agreement with the GCIC or contract with the GCIC and appropriate law enforcement agencies which have access to GCIC and Federal Bureau of Investigation information to have those agencies perform for the department criminal background checks for owners. The department or the appropriate law enforcement agencies may charge reasonable fees for performing criminal background checks.

The department’s determination regarding an owner’s criminal record, or any action by the department revoking or refusing to grant a license based on such determination, shall constitute a contested case for purposes of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” except that any hearing required to be held pursuant thereto may be held reasonably expeditiously after such determination or action by the department.

In a hearing held pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph or subsection (b) of this Code section, the hearing officer shall consider in mitigation the length of time since the crime was committed, the absence of additional criminal charges, the circumstances surrounding the commission of the crime, other indicia of rehabilitation, the facility’s history of compliance with the regulations, and the owner’s involvement with the licensed facility in arriving at a decision as to whether the criminal record requires the denial or revocation of the license to operate the facility. Where a hearing is required, at least 30 days prior to such hearing, the hearing officer shall notify the office of the prosecuting attorney who initiated the prosecution of the crime in question in order to allow the prosecutor to object to a possible determination that the conviction would not be a bar for the grant or continuation of a license as contemplated within this Code section. If objections are made, the hearing officer shall take such objections into consideration in considering the case.

The GCIC, the department, any law enforcement agency, and the employees of any such entities shall not be responsible for the accuracy of information nor have any liability for defamation, invasion of privacy, negligence, or any other claim in connection with any dissemination of information or determination based thereon pursuant to this Code section.

All information received from the Federal Bureau of Investigation or the GCIC shall be for the exclusive purpose of approving or denying the granting of a license to a new facility or the revision of a license of an existing facility when a new owner is proposed and shall not be released or otherwise disclosed to any other person or agency. All such information collected by the department shall be maintained by the department pursuant to laws regarding and the rules or regulations of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the GCIC, as is applicable. Penalties for the unauthorized release or disclosure of any such information shall be as prescribed pursuant to laws regarding and rules or regulations of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the GCIC, as is applicable.

The requirements of this Code section are supplemental to any requirements for a license imposed by Article 3 of Chapter 5 of this title or Article 14 of Chapter 7 of Title 31.

The department shall promulgate written rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this Code section.

If the department is participating in the program described in subparagraph (a)(1)(F) of Code Section 35-3-33, the Georgia Bureau of Investigation and the Federal Bureau of Investigation shall be authorized to retain fingerprints obtained pursuant to this Code section for such program and the department shall notify the individual whose fingerprints were taken of the parameters of such retention.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-2-14.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 305, § 1/HB 155; Ga. L. 2008, p. 1145, § 3/HB 984; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2013, p. 524, § 3-8/HB 78; Ga. L. 2014, p. 444, § 2-13/HB 271; Ga. L. 2018, p. 507, § 2-13/SB 336; Ga. L. 2018, p. 611, § 2-2/SB 406; Ga. L. 2019, p. 912, § 8/SB 9; Ga. L. 2020, p. 245, § 4/HB 911; Ga. L. 2021, p. 516, § 6/SB 117.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “Article 8 of Chapter 5 of Title 16” for “Code Section 16-5-100, relating to cruelty to a person 65 years of age or older” at the end of subparagraph (a)(2)(E); substituted “or” for “, relating to armed robbery” at the end of subparagraph (a)(2)(L); deleted subparagraph (a)(2)(M), which read: “A violation of Code Section 30-5-8, relating to abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a disabled adult or elder person; or”; and redesignated former subparagraph (a)(2)(N) as present subparagraph (a)(2)(M).

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, deleted “, relating to murder and felony murder” following “Code Section 16-5-1” at the end of subparagraph (a)(2)(A).

The 2018 amendments.

The first 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, added subsection (g). The second 2018 amendment, effective October 1, 2019, substituted “Article 14” for “Article 11” near the end of subsection (e).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, and continued, effective October 1, 2019, rewrote subparagraph (a)(2)(J), which read: “A violation of Code Section 16-6-5.1, relating to sexual assault against persons in custody, detained persons, or patients in hospitals or other institutions;”.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, added “and improper sexual contact by a foster parent” in subparagraph (a)(2)(J).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted “agent, improper sexual contact by a foster parent, and improper sexual contact by person in a position of trust” for “agent and improper sexual contact by a foster parent” in subparagraph (a)(2)(J).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2007, “to” was inserted preceding “this Code section” in paragraph (a)(9).

Administrative rules and regulations.

Criminal Justice Information Exchange and Dissemination, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Crime Information Council, Practice and Procedure, Chapter 290-5-35.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2018).

49-2-15.
Service of notice against department.

When any action is brought against the Department of Human Services, the Board of Human Services, the commissioner of human services, or any employee or agent thereof or when any action is brought in which the department could be held responsible for damages awarded in such action, it shall be the duty of the plaintiff to provide for service of notice of the pendency of such action by providing for service of a second original process, issued from the court in which the action is filed, upon the commissioner of human services personally or upon a person designated by the commissioner in writing to serve as agent for the acceptance of such service of process. The service of process in such action shall not be perfected until such second original process has been served as provided in this Code section. The provisions of this Code section shall be cumulative of any other requirements imposed by law for the service of process or notice.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-2-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 497, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1989, p. 497, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the amendment to this Code section by the Act shall apply to all actions filed on or after July 1, 1989.

49-2-16.
[Reserved] Council for Welfare Administration.

History.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 1423, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228; repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 552, § 12/SB 138, effective July 1, 2015.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 552, § 12/SB 138 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2015.

49-2-17.
Disciplinary actions against licensees or license applicants for certain violations.

This Code section shall be applicable to any agency, facility, institution, or entity subject to regulation by the department under Chapter 5 of this title. For purposes of this Code section, the term “license” shall be used to refer to any license, permit, registration, or commission issued by the department pursuant to the provisions of the law cited in this subsection.

The department shall have the authority to take any of the actions enumerated in subsection (c) of this Code section upon a finding that the applicant or licensee has:

Knowingly made any false statement of material information in connection with the application for a license, or in statements made or on documents submitted to the department as part of an inspection, survey, or investigation, or in the alteration or falsification of records maintained by the agency, facility, institution, or entity;

Failed or refused to provide the department with access to the premises subject to regulation or information pertinent to the initial or continued licensing of the agency, facility, institution, or entity;

Failed to comply with the licensing requirements of this state; or

Failed to comply with any provision of this Code section.

When the department finds that any applicant or licensee has violated any provision of subsection (b) of this Code section or laws, rules, regulations, or formal orders related to the initial or continued licensing of the agency, facility, institution, or entity, the department, subject to notice and opportunity for hearing, may take any of the following actions:

Refuse to grant a license; provided, however, that the department may refuse to grant a license without holding a hearing prior to taking such action;

Administer a public reprimand;

Suspend any license for a definite period or for an indefinite period in connection with any condition which may be attached to the restoration of said license;

Prohibit any applicant or licensee from allowing a person who previously was involved in the management or control, as defined by rule, of any agency, facility, institution, or entity which has had its license or application revoked or denied within the past 12 months to be involved in the management or control of such agency, facility, institution, or entity;

Revoke any license;

Impose a fine, not to exceed a total of $25,000.00, of up to $1,000.00 per day for each violation of a law, rule, regulation, or formal order related to the initial or ongoing licensing of any agency, facility, institution, or entity; or

Limit or restrict any license as the department deems necessary for the protection of the public, including, but not limited to, restricting some or all services of or admissions into an agency, facility, institution, or entity for a time certain.

In taking any of the actions enumerated in this subsection, the department shall consider the seriousness of the violation, including the circumstances, extent, and gravity of the prohibited acts, and the hazard or potential hazard created to the health or safety of the public.

The department may deny a license or otherwise restrict a license for any applicant who has had a license denied, revoked, or suspended within one year of the date of an application or who has transferred ownership or governing authority of an agency, facility, institution, or entity subject to regulation by the department within one year of the date of a new application when such transfer was made in order to avert denial, revocation, or suspension of a license.

With regard to any contested case instituted by the department pursuant to this Code section or other provisions of law which may now or hereafter authorize remedial or disciplinary grounds and action, the department may, in its discretion, dispose of the action so instituted by settlement. In such cases, all parties, successors, and assigns to any settlement agreement shall be bound by the terms specified therein and violation thereof by any applicant or licensee shall constitute grounds for any action enumerated in subsection (c) of this Code section.

The department shall have the authority to make public or private investigations or examinations inside or outside of this state to determine whether the provisions of this Code section or any other law, rule, regulation, or formal order relating to the licensing of any agency, facility, institution, or entity has been violated. Such investigations may be initiated at any time, in the discretion of the department, and may continue during the pendency of any action initiated by the department pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section.

For the purpose of conducting any investigation, inspection, or survey, the department shall have the authority to require the production of any books, records, papers, or other information related to the initial or continued licensing of any agency, facility, institution, or entity.

Pursuant to the investigation, inspection, and enforcement powers given to the department by this Code section and other applicable laws, the department may assess against an agency, facility, institution, or entity reasonable and necessary expenses incurred by the department pursuant to any administrative or legal action required by the failure of the agency, facility, institution, or entity to fully comply with the provisions of any law, rule, regulation, or formal order related to the initial or continued licensing. Assessments shall not include attorney’s fees and expenses of litigation, shall not exceed other actual expenses, and shall only be assessed if such investigations, inspection, or enforcement actions result in adverse findings, as finally determined by the department, pursuant to administrative or legal action.

For any action taken or any proceeding held under this Code section or under color of law, except for gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct, the department, when acting in its official capacity, shall be immune from liability and suit to the same extent that any judge of any court of general jurisdiction in this state would be immune.

In an administrative or legal proceeding under this Code section, a person or entity claiming an exemption or an exception granted by law, rule, regulation, or formal order has the burden of proving this exemption or exception.

This Code section and all actions resulting from its provisions shall be administered in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

The provisions of this Code section shall be supplemental to and shall not operate to prohibit the department from acting pursuant to those provisions of law which may now or hereafter authorize remedial or disciplinary grounds and action for the department. In cases where those other provisions of law so authorize other disciplinary grounds and actions, but this Code section limits such grounds or actions, those other provisions shall apply.

The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-2-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228.

49-2-18.
Director of Division of Family and Children Services; appointment; qualifications.

The Governor shall appoint the director of the Division of Family and Children Services of the department who shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The director shall be an employee of the department but shall report directly to the Governor.

The director shall have a college degree and at least one of the following qualifications:

Educational background or managerial experience involving work with vulnerable populations;

Work experience in a setting dealing with the safety or well-being of children or other vulnerable populations; or

Experience working in or managing a complex, multidisciplinary business or government agency.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-2-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 552, § 1/SB 138.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2015.

49-2-19.
DFCS State Advisory Board; membership; duties; officers and committees.

There is established the DFCS State Advisory Board which shall consist of 20 members appointed by the Governor as follows:

One representative from each of the 15 DFCS regions; and

Five members who are either state legislators or representatives from the fields of:

Child welfare;

Former youth in foster care;

Public health or behavioral health and developmental disabilities;

Private child welfare care provider; or

Juvenile justice.

The advisory board shall review and make recommendations to the director of the Division of Family and Children Services of the department regarding issues relating to the protection of children and the welfare and public assistance functions of the division. Such review and recommendations shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Examination of current law, rules and regulations, and policy and recommendations to improve the ability of the division to increase the safety of children, respond to child maltreatment, and ensure the well-being of and timely permanency for children who are referred to and involved in the child welfare system;

Propose legislative or administrative changes to policies and programs that are integral to the protection of children and the welfare and public assistance functions of the division;

Examination of caseload assignments and ratios of child protective services workers and recommendations for reasonable expectations for such workers and supervision and support needed to perform their jobs; and

Recommendations on improved collaboration among state, local, community, and public and private stakeholders in child welfare programs and services that are administered by the division.

The advisory board shall elect a chairperson from among its membership. The advisory board may elect such other officers and establish committees as it considers appropriate.

The advisory board shall meet at least quarterly and at such additional times as it shall determine necessary to perform its duties. The advisory board shall also meet on the call of the chairperson, the director of the Division of Family and Children Services of the department, or the Governor. The director of the Division of Family and Children Services of the department shall participate in such meetings and provide a quarterly report to the advisory board in advance of each quarterly meeting.

Members shall serve without compensation, although each member of the advisory board shall be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duties from funds available to the advisory board; provided, however, that any legislative member shall receive the allowances authorized by law for legislative members of interim legislative committees and any members who are state employees shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred by them in the same manner as they are reimbursed for expenses in their capacities as state employees.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-2-19

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 552, § 1/SB 138.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2015.